District of Columbia statutes.
7-1105

Consultation concerning proposed transferee.

The Compact Administrator is hereby directed to consult with the immediate family of any proposed transferee and, in the case of a proposed transferee from an institution in the District of Columbia to an institution in a party state, to take no final action without approval of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 26, 1972, 86 Stat. 131, Pub. L. 92-280, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1805.
1973 Ed., § 6-1605.